Utah statutes.
10-8-55.   Fire departments -- Fire-fighting equipment -- Rules and regulations.

They may, except as otherwise provided by law, provide for the organization and support of a fire department, procure fire engines, hooks, ladders, buckets, hose and other apparatus, organize fire engine and hook and ladder companies, prescribe duties, rules and regulations for the government thereof, with such penalty as they may deem proper, and make all necessary appropriations therefor.



Amended by Chapter 19, 1957 General Session

